Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7139.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 39-26.6-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-26.6 entitled "The
Renewable Energy Growth Program" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-26.6-2. Renewable energy growth program established.
To carry out these purposes, a tariff-based, renewable energy distributed-generation
financing program, hereinafter referred to as the renewable energy growth program, is hereby
established with the intention of continuing the development of renewable energy distributed
generation in the load zone of the electric distribution company at reasonable cost. The program
shall be designed to finance the development, construction, and operation of renewable energy
distributed-generation projects over five (5) years through a performance-based incentive system
that is designed to achieve specified megawatt targets at reasonable cost through competitive
processes. The renewable energy growth program shall be implemented by the electric distribution
company, and guided by the distributed-generation board, in consultation with the office of energy
resources, subject to the review and supervision of the commission; provided, however, that any
tariffs, costs or other mandates imposed under §§ 39-26.6-5, 39-26.6-6, 39-26.6-13, 39-26.6-18 or
39-26.6-25 shall be subject to review and approval by the general assembly.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003623
========